New Jersey, session 222, A4073.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the Governor shall transmit the budget message for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027 to the Legislature on or before March 10, 2026. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.